District of Columbia statutes.
9-1103.04

Effect of Compact on other laws.

Upon the effective date of the Compact and so long thereafter as the Compact remains effective, the applicability of the laws of the United States, and the rules, regulations, and orders promulgated thereunder, relating to or affecting transportation under the Compact and to the persons engaged therein, including those provisions of § 50-2201.03(e), relating to the powers of the Public Service Commission of the District of Columbia and the Joint Board created under such section, is suspended, except as otherwise specified in the Compact, to the extent that such laws, rules, regulations, and orders are inconsistent with or in duplication of the provisions of the Compact; provided, that upon the termination of the Compact, the suspension of such laws, rules, regulations, and orders, if not theretofore repealed, shall terminate and such laws, rules, regulations, and orders shall thereupon again become applicable and legally effective without further legislative or administrative action; provided further, that nothing in this subchapter or in the Compact shall affect the normal and ordinary police powers of the signatories and of the political subdivisions thereof and of the Director of the National Park Service with respect to the regulation of vehicles, control of traffic and use of streets, highways, and other vehicular facilities; provided further, that nothing in this subchapter or in the Compact consented to and approved hereby shall impair or affect the rights, duties, and obligations created by the Act of July 24, 1956 (70 Stat. 598, ch. 669), granting a franchise to D.C. Transit System, Inc.; provided further, that the term “public interest” as used in § 3(c) of Article XII, Title II of the Compact shall be deemed to include, among other things, the interest of the carrier employees affected; and provided further, that nothing herein shall be deemed to render inapplicable any laws of the United States providing benefits for the employees of any carrier subject to this Compact or relating to the wages, hours, and working conditions of employees of any carrier, or to collective bargaining between the carriers and said employees, or to the rights to self-organization, including, but not limited to, the Labor-Management Relations Act, 1947, as amended (29 U.S.C. § 141 et seq.), and the Fair Labor Standards Act, as amended (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.). Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission of the District of Columbia and of the Interstate Commerce Commission over all carriers and persons subject to the provisions of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact are hereby transferred, as and to the extent provided therein, to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission.

History

Sept. 15, 1960, 74 Stat. 1050, Pub. L. 86-794, § 3
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2414.
1973 Ed., § 1-1412.

Editor's Notes

This section was enacted prior to revision of the Compact. References to specific sections of the Compact have been updated following revision of the Compact.

Joint Board abolished: The Joint Board, referred to in the first sentence, was abolished by § 503(c) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967.